Hawaii statutes.
§209E-8 Rules. Rules prescribing
procedures effectuating the purpose of this chapter shall be adopted by the
department in consultation with the department of taxation pursuant to chapter
91. [L 1986, c 78, pt of §1; am L 1989, c 390, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next